Nebraska, session 109, LB584.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB584 LB584
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-105.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
28-105.02 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
penalty for any person convicted of a Class IA felony for an offense
committed when such person was under the age of eighteen years shall be:
(a) For a Class IA felony, a maximum sentence of not greater than
fifty years' life imprisonment and a minimum sentence of not less than
twenty forty years' imprisonment; .
(b) For a Class IB felony, a maximum sentence of not greater than
forty years' imprisonment and a minimum sentence of not less than ten
years' imprisonment;
(c) For a Class IC felony, a maximum sentence of not greater than
twenty years' imprisonment and a minimum sentence of not less than five
years' imprisonment;
(d) For a Class ID felony, a maximum sentence of not greater than
twenty years' imprisonment and a minimum sentence of not less than three
years' imprisonment;
(e) For a Class II felony, a maximum sentence of not greater than
twenty years' imprisonment and a minimum sentence of not less than one
year's imprisonment; and
(f) For a Class IIA felony, a maximum sentence of ten years'
imprisonment and a minimum sentence of no imprisonment.
(2) In determining the sentence of a convicted person under
subsection (1) of this section, the court shall consider mitigating
factors which led to the commission of the offense. The convicted person
may submit mitigating factors to the court, including, but not limited
to:
(a) The convicted person's age at the time of the offense;
(b) The impetuosity of the convicted person;
(c) The convicted person's family and community environment;
(d) The convicted person's ability to appreciate the risks and
-2-

LB584 LB584
2025 2025
consequences of the conduct;
(e) The convicted person's intellectual capacity; and
(f) The outcome of a comprehensive mental health evaluation of the
convicted person conducted by an adolescent mental health professional
licensed in this state. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited
to, interviews with the convicted person's family in order to learn about
the convicted person's prenatal history, developmental history, medical
history, substance abuse treatment history, if any, social history, and
psychological history.
Sec. 2. Section 29-2204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2204 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
except when a term of life imprisonment is required by law, in imposing a
sentence upon an offender for any class of felony other than a Class III,
IIIA, or IV felony, the court shall fix the minimum and the maximum terms
of the sentence to be served within the limits provided by law. The
maximum term shall not be greater than the maximum limit provided by law,
and:
(a) The minimum term fixed by the court shall be any term of years
less than the maximum term imposed by the court; or
(b) The minimum term shall be the minimum limit provided by law.
(2) In imposing a sentence for a Class IA, IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA
felony upon an offender who was under eighteen years of age at the time
of the offense, the court shall fix the minimum and the maximum terms of
the sentence as provided in section 28-105.02.
(3) (2) When a maximum term of life is imposed by the court for a
Class IB felony for an offender who was eighteen years of age or older at
the time of the offense, the minimum term fixed by the court shall be:
(a) Any term of years not less than the minimum limit provided by
law; or
(b) A term of life imprisonment.
-3-

LB584 LB584
2025 2025
(4) (3) When a maximum term of life is imposed by the court for a
Class IA felony for an offender who was eighteen years of age or older at
the time of the offense, the minimum term fixed by the court shall be a :
(a) A term of life imprisonment. ; or
(b) Any term of years not less than the minimum limit provided by
law after consideration of the mitigating factors in section 28-105.02,
if the defendant was under eighteen years of age at the time he or she
committed the crime for which he or she was convicted.
(5) (4) When the court is of the opinion that imprisonment may be
appropriate but desires more detailed information as a basis for
determining the sentence to be imposed than has been provided by the
presentence report required by section 29-2261, the court may commit an
offender to the Department of Correctional Services. During that time,
the department shall conduct a complete study of the offender as provided
in section 29-2204.03.
(6) Whenever (5) Except when a term of life is required by law,
whenever the defendant was under eighteen years of age at the time he or
she committed the crime for which he or she was convicted, the court may,
in its discretion, instead of imposing the penalty provided for the
crime, make such disposition of the defendant as the court deems proper
under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(7)(a) (6)(a) When imposing an indeterminate sentence upon an
offender under this section, the court shall:
(i) Advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her minimum term before attaining parole eligibility
assuming that no good time for which the offender will be eligible is
lost; and
(ii) Advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her maximum term before attaining mandatory release
assuming that no good time for which the offender will be eligible is
lost.
-4-

LB584 LB584
2025 2025
(b) If any discrepancy exists between the statement of the minimum
limit of the sentence and the statement of parole eligibility or between
the statement of the maximum limit of the sentence and the statement of
mandatory release, the statements of the minimum limit and the maximum
limit shall control the calculation of the offender's term.
(c) If the court imposes more than one sentence upon an offender or
imposes a sentence upon an offender who is at that time serving another
sentence, the court shall state whether the sentences are to be
concurrent or consecutive.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-105.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 29-2204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-5-